District of Columbia statutes.
25-126

On-site sales consumption permit.

(a)

The holder of a manufacturer’s license, class A or B, may apply for an onsite sales and consumption permit to use a portion of the licensed premises for the on-premises sale, service, and consumption of beer brewed by the brewery, wine manufactured by the winery, and beverages with spirits distilled by the distillery.

(b)

The holder of an on-site sales and consumption permit shall only sell, serve, and permit the consumption of beer brewed by the brewery, wine manufactured by the winery, and beverages with spirits distilled by the distillery and purchased by the customer between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 12:00 a.m., 7 days a week.

(c)

The on-premises sales and consumption permit shall not obviate the requirement of the holder of a manufacturer’s license, class A or B, to obtain a tasting permit pursuant to § 25-118, to be authorized to provide samples of beer, wine, or spirits.

(d)

A violation of this section shall constitute a primary tier violation.

(e)

Any additional spirits that are added to beverages primarily containing spirits distilled by the distillery shall be purchased from a wholesaler or manufacturer licensed under this title.

(e-1)

The holder of a manufacturer’s license class A or B that holds an on-site sales and consumption permit may sell or serve beer, wine, and spirits purchased from a licensed wholesaler or licensed manufacturer at private events not open to the public for on-premises consumption.

(f)

For the purposes of this section, the term “beverages” means brandy, cordials, fortified wines, liqueur, and non-alcoholic beverages.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 2002(c), 61 DCR 9990
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(a)(7), 62 DCR 1866
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-84, § 2(a)(9), 63 DCR 781
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 rewrote (a); added “wine manufactured by the winery, and beverages with spirits distilled by the distillery” in (b); rewrote (c); and added (e) and (f).
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-84 substituted “8:00 a.m. and 12:00 a.m.” for “1:00 p.m. and 9:00 p.m.” in (b); and added (e-1).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).